New Jersey, session 222, A4645.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.170 (C.18A:62-4.4) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, a student, other than a nonimmigrant alien within the meaning of section 101 (a)(15) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act" (8 U.S.C. s.1101(a)(15)), shall be exempt from paying out-of-State tuition at a public institution of higher education if the student: (1)   attended high school in this State for three or more years; (2)   graduated from a high school in this State or received the equivalent of a high school diploma in this State; (3)   registers as an entering student or is currently enrolled in a public institution of higher education not earlier than the fall semester of the 2013-2014 academic year; and (4)   [in the case of a person without lawful immigration status, files an affidavit with the institution of higher education stating that the student has filed an application to legalize his immigration status or will file an application as soon as he is eligible to do so] is a citizen of the United States or an eligible noncitizen, as determined under 20 U.S.C. s.1091. b.    Student information obtained in the implementation of this section shall be confidential. c.     The Secretary of Higher Education shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section. (cf: P.L.2013, c.170, s.1) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.411 (C.18A:62-4.6) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Notwithstanding any provision of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.170 (C.18A:62-4.4) or any other section of law to the contrary, a student who holds a T or U visa or a dependent student whose parent or guardian holds an H-1B, O-1 or O-2 visa shall be exempt from paying out-of-State tuition at a public institution of higher education provided the student meets the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) through [(4)] (3) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.170 (C.18A:62-4.4). (cf: P.L.2021, c.341, s.1) 3.    Section 2 of P.L.2021, c.341 (C.18A:71B-2.6) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of law to the contrary, a student who is a victim of trafficking, domestic violence, or other serious crime who has been granted a status under 8 U.S.C. s.1101 (a)(15)(T) or 8 U.S.C. s.1101 (a)(15)(U) shall be eligible to participate in any student financial aid, grant, or scholarship program under chapter 71B of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, provided the student meets the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) through [(4)] (3) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.170 (C.18A:62-4.4). (cf: P.L.2021, c.341, s.2) 4.    P.L.2018, c.12 (C.18A:71B-2.1) is repealed. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.